Utah statutes.
78A-9-101.   Admission to state bar -- Criminal history background checks.

(1)  The Utah State Bar shall require each person applying for admission to the Utah State Bar to submit a complete set of fingerprints for the purpose of conducting a national criminal history background check.

(2)  Fingerprints of applicants for admission to the Utah State Bar shall be submitted to the Department of Public Safety, Bureau of Criminal Identification to be used to conduct a criminal history background check and to the Federal Bureau of Investigation to obtain a national criminal history background check.

(3)  The criminal history background information obtained from the Department of Public Safety and the national criminal history background information obtained from the Federal Bureau of Investigation pursuant to this section may be used by the Utah State Bar to determine an applicant's character, fitness, and suitability for admission to the Utah State Bar.

